Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.3802

Ownership in doubt.

"Ownership in doubt" means that a vehicle or vessel owner is unable to obtain satisfactory evidence of ownership or releases of interest and is permitted to apply for a three-year registration period without a certificate of title or a three-year period with a bond covering the certificate of title.

[ 2010 c 161 s 129.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.